Utah statutes.
10-9a-202.   Applicant notice -- Waiver of requirements.
(1)  For each land use application, the municipality shall:
(a)  notify the applicant of the date, time, and place of each public hearing
and public meeting to consider the application;
(b)  provide to each applicant a copy of each staff report regarding the
applicant or the pending application at least three business days before the
public hearing or public meeting; and
(c)  notify the applicant of any final action on a pending application.
(2)  If a municipality fails to comply with the requirements of Subsection
(1)(a) or (b) or both, an applicant may waive the failure so that the
application may stay on the public hearing or public meeting agenda and be
considered as if the requirements had been met.
